src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!2016-12-20!"0:p in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:p <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ Cns Vow: p [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: p Vow: Cns [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] p  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: p  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: p ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:b in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:b <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: b Vow: Cns: [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!     	  [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ Cns Vow: b [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] b  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: b  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: b ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:t in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:t <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: t Vow: Cns: [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!     	  [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ Cns Vow: t [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] t  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: t  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: t ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:t̕ in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:t̕ <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: t̕ Vow: Cns: [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20! 	  [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ Cns Vow: t̕ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] t̕  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: t̕  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: t̕ ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:d in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:d <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: d Vow: Cns: [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!     	  [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ Cns Vow: d [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] d  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: d  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: d ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:č in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:č <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: č Vow: Cns: [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!	 [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ Cns Vow: č [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] č  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: č  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: č ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:š in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:š <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: š Vow: Cns: [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!	 [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ Cns Vow: š [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] š  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: š  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: š ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:l in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:l <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ [ Cns - q ] Vow: l [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!	 [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: l Vow: Cns [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] l  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: l  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: l ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:l̕ in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:l̕ <=>
!2016-12-20!      [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ [ q ] Vow: l [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!	 [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: l̕ Vow: Cns [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] l̕  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: l̕  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: l̕ ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:ƛ̕ in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:ƛ̕ <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ Cns Vow: ƛ̕ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: ƛ̕ Vow: Cns [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] ƛ̕  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: ƛ̕  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: ƛ̕ ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:y in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:y <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: y Vow: Cns: [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!     	  [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ Cns Vow: y [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] y  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: y  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: y ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:k̓ʷ in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:k̓ʷ <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ Cns Vow: k̓ʷ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: k̓ʷ Vow: Cns: [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] k̓ʷ  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: k̓ʷ  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: k̓ʷ ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:q in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:q <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ Cns Vow: q [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: q Vow: Cns [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] q  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: q  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: q ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:qʷ in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:qʷ <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ Cns Vow: qʷ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: qʷ Vow: Cns [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] qʷ  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: qʷ  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: qʷ ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:x̌ in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:x̌ <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ Cns Vow: x̌ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: x̌ Vow: Cns [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] x̌  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: x̌  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: x̌ ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:x̌ʷ in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:x̌ʷ <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ Cns Vow: x̌ʷ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: x̌ʷ Vow: Cns [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] x̌ʷ  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: x̌ʷ  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: x̌ʷ ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:ʔ in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:ʔ <=> [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ Cns Vow: ʔ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: ʔ Vow: Cns [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] ʔ  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: ʔ  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: ʔ ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:w̓ in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:w̓ <=>
!2016-12-20!      [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ [ q ] Vow: w [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!	 [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: w̓ Vow: Cns [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] w̓  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: w̓  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: w̓ ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"0:y̓ in reduplication"
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20! 0:y̓ <=>
!2016-12-20!      [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: _ [ q ] Vow: y [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!	 [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: 0: y̓ Vow: Cns [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] y̓  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^Red1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!        [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] 0: 0: y̓  ə: _ [ Cns | Vow ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!         [ # | %^√:0 | %< ] _ 0: y̓ ə: 0: [ Cns | Vow ] [ Lts: | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
!2016-12-20!
!
!2016-12-20!"Require 0: before Red2CVC:0 "
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20!%^RedPL123123:0 => 0: [ Lts: | » ]* _ ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"Require 0: before Red1CV1toCV2C:0 "
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20!%^Red1i13:0 => 0: [ Lts: | » ]* _ ;
!2016-12-20!
!2016-12-20!"Require 0: before Red1CV1toCV2CPL:0 "
!2016-12-20!!! __@RULENAME@__
!2016-12-20!%^RedPL1i1i13:0 => 0: [ Lts: | » ]* _ ;
!2016-12-20!


!!TESTS
!echo 's ^√:0 {p5}:č {p4}:i {p3}:č {p2}:i {p1}:0 č ə:0 t xʷ ə d ^Red1CV1toCV2CPL:0' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
!echo 'sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl' | hfst-lookup src/fst/lexicon.hfst
